Maryland, session 2025, HB0274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
2–303.1.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0274*

HOUSE BILL 274
(a) At least [6] 7 months before each statewide primary election, each local board
shall submit [a polling place plan] AN ELECTION PLAN to the State Board for approval.
(B) AN ELECTION PLAN SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A POLLING PLACE PLAN THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION;
(2) A BALLOT DROP BOX PLAN DEVELOPED IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–304 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) AN EARLY VOTING CENTER PLAN THAT MEETS THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(4) AN ANALYSIS OF HOW TO MAXIMIZE VOTER PARTICIPATION IN THE
COUNTY AND EACH PRECINCT.
[(b)] (C) A polling place plan shall include:
(1) evidence that the plan complies with § 10–101(a)(2) of this article; AND
(2) [an analysis of how to maximize voter participation in each precinct;
and
(3)] if the polling place plan proposes to reduce the total number of separate
buildings used as polling places below the total number of separate buildings used as
polling places in the [2018] FIRST STATEWIDE general election HELD AFTER THE MOST
RECENT REDISTRICTING BASED ON THE CENSUS:
(i) the address and a description of the location of each affected
polling place;
(ii) an analysis of available suitable buildings within the precinct
boundary, including the availability of parking and a determination regarding building
compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act;
(iii) of the voters who cast ballots in each affected precinct in the
three most recent statewide elections:
1. the percentage who voted in person on election day;
2. the percentage who voted by mail;
3. the number who registered to vote on election day; and

HOUSE BILL 274 3
4. the number who voted at an early voting center;
(iv) the proximity of the proposed polling place to a dense
concentration of voters in the affected precinct;
(v) the change in the number of registered voters in the affected
precinct from the last statewide election;
(vi) the public transportation options that voters in each affected
precinct could use to access the polling place that would serve the precinct under the plan;
and
(vii) an analysis of the impact on the ability of historically
disenfranchised communities to cast a ballot, including demographic information of the
voters in the affected precinct [from the most recent report published by the Maryland Vital
Statistics Administration].
(D) AN EARLY VOTING CENTER PLAN SHALL TAKE INTO ACCOUNT THE
FOLLOWING FACTORS WHEN DETERMINING THE LOCATION OF AN EARLY VOTING
CENTER IN THE COUNTY:
(1) ACCESSIBILITY OF THE EARLY VOTING CENTER TO HISTORICALLY
DISENFRANCHISED COMMUNITIES, INCLUDING CULTURAL GROUPS, ETHNIC
GROUPS, AND MINORITY GROUPS;
(2) PROXIMITY OF THE EARLY VOTING CENTER TO DENSE
CONCENTRATIONS OF VOTERS;
(3) ACCESSIBILITY OF THE EARLY VOTING CENTER BY PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION;
(4) FOR COUNTIES WITH FOUR OR MORE EARLY VOTING CENTERS,
ENSURING EQUITABLE DISTRIBUTION OF EARLY VOTING CENTERS THROUGHOUT
THE COUNTY; AND
(5) THE USE OF COMMUNITY CENTERS AND PUBLIC GATHERING
PLACES.
[(c)] (E) The State Board shall approve [a polling place plan] AN ELECTION
PLAN OF A LOCAL BOARD if the [polling place plan] ELECTION PLAN:
(1) complies with the requirements of this section and § 10–101(a)(2) of this
article; [and]
(2) HAS BEEN REVIEWED BY THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR; AND

HOUSE BILL 274
[(2)] (3) will not negatively affect access to voting for historically
disenfranchised communities.
[(d)] (F) [(1) The State Board shall reject a polling place plan that does not
meet the requirements of subsection (c) of this section.
(2)] If the State Board [rejects a polling place plan] DOES NOT APPROVE
AN ELECTION PLAN UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, the local board shall
submit a revised [polling place plan] ELECTION PLAN to the State Board within 15 days
after the date on which the State Board rejected the previous plan.
2–304.
(a) (1) EACH LOCAL BOARD SHALL DEVELOP A BALLOT DROP BOX PLAN
THAT INCLUDES THE PROPOSED LOCATION OF EACH BALLOT DROP BOX IN THE
COUNTY.
(2) A local board shall consider the following factors when determining the
location of a ballot drop box:
[(1)] (I) the accessibility of the ballot drop box to historically
disenfranchised communities, including voters with disabilities, cultural groups, ethnic
groups, and minority groups;
[(2)] (II) proximity of the ballot drop box to dense concentrations of voters;
[(3)] (III) accessibility of the ballot drop box by public transportation; AND
[(4)] (IV) equitable GEOGRAPHIC distribution of ballot drop boxes
throughout the county[; and
(5) maximizing voter participation, including through placement of ballot
drop boxes at community centers and public gathering places].
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a local board shall designate locations
in the county at which a ballot drop box will be placed in accordance with the factors set
forth in subsection (a) of this section.
(c) (1) Each local board shall submit the BALLOT DROP BOX PLAN WITH THE
proposed locations in the county for each ballot drop box to the State Administrator for
approval.
(2) The State Administrator shall approve a ballot drop box location that
meets the factors established under subsection (a) of this section.

HOUSE BILL 274 5
(3) If a proposed ballot drop box [location] PLAN does not meet the factors
LISTED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, BEFORE THE LOCAL BOARD’S
ELECTION PLAN IS SUBMITTED TO THE STATE BOARD FOR APPROVAL UNDER §
2–303.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE, the State Administrator shall:
(i) require that the local board reconsider the proposed location for
one or more ballot drop boxes; and
(ii) provide to the local board a detailed explanation of why the
proposed location does not meet the factors.
(4) If the State Administrator finds that the proposed ballot drop box
locations submitted to the State Administrator after reconsideration by the local board
under paragraph (3) of this subsection do not meet the factors, the State Administrator may
add ballot drop box locations in the county.
10–301.1.
[(c) (1) No later than 6 months before a primary election, the local board in
each county shall, subject to the approval of the State Board, designate each early voting
center in that county.
(2) A local board shall take into account the following factors when
determining the location of an early voting center:
(i) accessibility of the early voting center to historically
disenfranchised communities, including cultural groups, ethnic groups, and minority
groups;
(ii) proximity of the early voting center to dense concentrations of
voters;
(iii) accessibility of the early voting center by public transportation;
(iv) ensuring equitable distribution of early voting centers
throughout the county; and
(v) maximizing voter participation, including through the use of
community centers and public gathering places as locations for early voting centers.]
[(d)] (C) Each early voting center shall be open for voting as follows:
(1) beginning the second Thursday before a primary or general election
through the Thursday before the election; and
(2) during the hours between 7 a.m. and 8 p.m. each early voting day.

HOUSE BILL 274
[(e)] (D) (1) Each early voting center shall satisfy the requirements of §
10–101 of this title.
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the public official
responsible for the use of a public building requested by a local board for an early voting
center shall make the public building available to the local board in accordance with §
10–101(a)(3) of this title.
(3) (i) The State Board shall adopt regulations that establish an
appeals process for public officials responsible for public buildings requested for use under
paragraph (2) of this subsection to contest the availability of the public building during the
period of time the building would be used as an early voting center.
(ii) The appeals process established under this paragraph shall
include:
1. an initial appeal to the local board that selected the public
building for use as an early voting center;
2. an opportunity for a public official to be heard publicly at
a meeting of the local board before the local board makes a decision on the appeal;
3. an appeal by a public official of an adverse decision of the
local board to the State Board;
4. an opportunity for a public official to be heard publicly at
a meeting of the State Board before the State Board makes a final decision on the appeal;
and
5. a final decision at least 8 months before the primary
election for which the local board seeks to use the public building as an early voting center.
(iii) The decision of the State Board regarding an appeal under this
paragraph is final.
[(f)] (E) Beginning 30 days prior to each early voting period the State Board and
each local board shall undertake steps to inform the public about early voting and the
location of early voting centers in each county, including:
(1) a series of public service media announcements;
(2) mailings to all registered voters in each county; and
(3) other measures as appropriate.

HOUSE BILL 274 7
[(g)] (F) Except as expressly provided in this section, any provision of this article
that applies to voting on election day also applies to early voting.
[(h)] (G) The State Board shall adopt regulations and guidelines in accordance
with the requirements of this section for the conduct of early voting.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.